Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-1101.01
Act; purposes.

The purposes of the New Markets Job Growth Investment Act are to:

(1) Provide access to capital to small businesses that are not otherwise able to receive affordable financing;

(2) Attract investment dollars from the New Markets Tax Credit Program of the United States Department of the Treasury; and

(3) Ensure Nebraska small businesses have access to capital to retain and add jobs.

Laws 2021, LB682, § 2.